voikko-fi/vvfst/asemosanat.lexc
LEXICON AsemosanaTämä
[Sn][Ny]mä:mä	Liitesana_ä	;
?Murre [Sn][Ny]ä:ä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]män:män	Liitesana_ä	;
?Murre [Sg][Ny]n:n	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]tä:tä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Ny]ksi:ksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Ny]nä:nä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]ssä:ssä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Ny]stä:stä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]hän:hän	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]llä:llä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltä:ltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaNämä
[Sn][Nm]mä:mä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]iden:iden	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]itten:itten	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Nm]itä:itä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Nm]iksi:iksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Nm]inä:inä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Nm]issä:issä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Nm]istä:istä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]ihin:ihin	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Nm]illä:illä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Nm]iltä:iltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Nm]ille:ille	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sko][Nm]ine:ine	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaTuo
[Sn][Ny]:	Liitesana_a	;
AsemosanaTuo2	;

LEXICON AsemosanaTuo2
[Sg][Ny]n:n	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Ny]ta:ta	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]ksi:ksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]na:na	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]ssa:ssa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]sta:sta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]hon:hon	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]nne:nne	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]lla:lla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]lta:lta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaNuo
[Sn][Nm]uo:uo	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]oiden:oiden	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]oitten:oitten	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Nm]oita:oita	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Nm]oiksi:oiksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Nm]oina:oina	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Nm]oissa:oissa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Nm]oista:oista	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Nm]oihin:oihin	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Nm]oilla:oilla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Nm]oilta:oilta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Nm]oille:oille	Liitesana_a	;
[Sko][Nm]oine:oine	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMikä
[Sn][Ny]kä:kä	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sn][Ny]kä[Fkin]kin:käkin	Loppu	;
[Sg][Ny]nkä:nkä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]tä:tä	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sp][Ny][Fkin]täkin:täkin	Loppu	;
[Sp][Ny]täs:täs	Loppu	;
[Str][Ny]ksi:ksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Ny]ksikä:ksikä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Ny]nä:nä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]ssä:ssä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]ssään:ssään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Ny]stä:stä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Ny]stään:stään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]hin:hin	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]hinkä:hinkä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]nne:nne	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]nnekä:nnekä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]llä:llä	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sade][Ny][Fkin]lläkin:lläkin	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltä:ltä	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny][Fkin]ltäkin:ltäkin	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]llekä:llekä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Nm]tkä:tkä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Nm]tkään:tkään	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMikään
[Sn][Ny]kään:kään	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]nkään:nkään	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]tään:tään	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Ses][Ny]nään:nään	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]llään:llään	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltään:ltään	LiitesanaKoPaHan_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMikin
[Sn][Ny]kin:kin	Loppu	;
[Sg][Ny]nkin:nkin	Loppu	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMuuan
[Sn][Ny]an:an	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]anna:anna	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Ny]atta:atta	Liitesana_a	;
